Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska24-337.01
Clerk of the district court; assist
clerk of county court; agreement; contents.

When the clerk of the county court or
the county court staff are temporarily unavailable or available on less than
a full-time basis, the clerk of the district court shall, under the direction
of the county court judge and in cooperation and agreement with the Supreme
Court and State Court Administrator, assist the clerk of the county court
in the provision of county court services which would otherwise require the
presence of county court staff. Any agreement entered into under this section
must be signed and stipulated to by the State Court Administrator, the county
board, and the clerk of the district court after obtaining input from the
clerk of the county court, a district court judge, a county court judge, and
the county attorney. Any agreement entered into under this section may include,
but is not limited to, financial considerations and scheduling.

Laws 2011, LB669, § 5.